Utah statutes.
78B-1-139.   Witnesses -- Unlawful arrest -- Void -- Damages recoverable.

The arrest of a witness contrary to Section 78B-1-138 is void, and when willfully made is a contempt of the court.  The person making the arrest is responsible to the witness arrested for double the amount of the damages which may be assessed against the witness, and is also liable to an action at the suit of the party serving the witness with the subpoena for the damages sustained by the party in consequence of the arrest.

